Hawaii statutes.
§454F-1.7 Duties of a mortgage loan
originator company's qualified individual and branch manager. (a) A
qualified individual shall have the duty to manage and supervise the mortgage
loan origination activities of a licensed mortgage loan originator company's
principal office and the licensed mortgage loan originators located at or
working out of the principal office and all company branch offices. A
qualified individual shall hold a license as a mortgage loan originator issued
pursuant to this chapter.

(b) A branch manager shall have the duty
to directly manage and supervise a licensed mortgage loan originator company's
branch office and the licensed mortgage loan originators located at or working
out of that location. A branch manager shall be physically present in the
branch office and shall hold a license as a mortgage loan originator issued
pursuant to this chapter.

(c) A qualified individual for a mortgage
loan originator company shall be responsible for:

(1) Supervising the maintenance and accounting of
client trust accounts and disbursements from those accounts;

(2) Supervising the maintenance of all records,
contracts, and documents of the mortgage loan originator company;

(3) Supervising all mortgage loan originator
agreements and mortgage loan documents and the handling of these documents by
the licensed mortgage loan originators who are employed by or are independent
contractors of the mortgage loan originator company;

(4) Supervising all licensed mortgage loan
originators who are employed by or are independent contractors of the mortgage
loan originator company;

(5) Developing and enforcing policies and procedures
relating to the handling of residential mortgage loan transactions and the
professional conduct of the licensed mortgage loan originators and other staff;

(6) Developing and monitoring compliance with a
policy on continuing education requirements for all licensed mortgage loan
originators who are employed by or are independent contractors of the mortgage
loan originator company pursuant to the requirements of this chapter and the
rules of the commissioner;

(7) Ensuring that the licenses of all mortgage loan
originators who are employed by or are independent contractors of the mortgage
loan originator company, and the license of the mortgage loan originator
company are current and active, and that all required fees are timely paid to
the mortgage loan recovery fund;

(8) Establishing and conducting a training program
for all licensed mortgage loan originators who are employed by or are
independent contractors of the mortgage loan originator company;

(9) Ensuring that all licensed mortgage loan
originators who are employed by or are independent contractors of the mortgage
loan originator company are provided adequate information and training on the
latest amendments to licensing laws and rules and any other applicable laws and
rules;

(10) Notifying the commissioner of the termination of
the employment or independent contractor relationship of licensed mortgage loan
originators who were employed by or were independent contractors of the
mortgage loan originator company upon the termination of employment or the
independent contractor relationship; and

(11) Ensuring that the records, loan documents, and
agreements including mortgage loan originator agreements are retained for seven
years on paper or in electronic format by the mortgage loan originator company.

(d) A branch manager for a branch office shall
be responsible for supervising:

(1) The maintenance of all records, contracts, and
documents of the mortgage loan originator company branch office;

(2) All mortgage loan originator agreements and
mortgage loan documents and the handling of these documents by the licensed
mortgage loan originators or independent contractors located at or working out
of the mortgage loan originator company branch office; and

(3) All licensed mortgage loan originators who are
employed by, or are independent contractors of, the mortgage loan originator
company and who are located at or working out of the mortgage loan originator
company branch office. [L 2011, c 194, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 252, §5; am L
2013, c 168, §5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next